Washington statutes.
RCW 42.45.250

Rules.

(1) The director may adopt rules necessary to implement this chapter.

(2) In adopting, amending, or repealing rules about notarial acts with respect to electronic records, the director shall consider standards, practices, and customs of other jurisdictions that substantially enact this chapter.

[ 2017 c 281 s 27.]